North Dakota statutes. TITLE 15.1 Elementary and Secondary Education
CHAPTER 15.1-04.1 Compact on Educational Opportunity for Military Children
Reinstatement following withdrawal of a member state occurs upon the withdrawing state re-enacting the compact or upon such later date as determined by the commission.

2.

This compact dissolves effective upon the date of the withdrawal or default of the member state which reduces the membership in the compact to one member state. Upon the dissolution of this compact, the compact becomes null and void and is of no further force or effect, and the business and affairs of the commission must be concluded and surplus funds must be distributed in accordance with the bylaws.

ARTICLE XVII
— SEVERABILITY AND CONSTRUCTION

1.

The provisions of this compact are severable and if any phrase, clause, sentence, or provision is determined unenforceable, the remaining provisions of the compact are enforceable.

2.

This compact must be liberally construed to effectuate its purposes.

3.

Nothing in this compact prohibits the applicability of other interstate compacts to which the states are members.

ARTICLE XVIII
— BINDING EFFECT OF COMPACT AND OTHER LAWS

1.

Nothing in this compact prevents the enforcement of any other law of a member state that is not inconsistent with this compact. All member states’ laws conflicting with this compact are superseded to the extent of the conflict.

2. a.

All lawful actions of the commission, including all rules and bylaws promulgated by the commission, are binding upon the member states.

b.

All agreements between the commission and the member states are binding in accordance with their terms.

c.

If any provision of this compact exceeds the constitutional limits imposed on the legislature of any member state, the provision is ineffective to the extent of the conflict with the constitutional provision in question in that member state.